Idaho, session 2026, H0492.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 19-5102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-5102. COUNCIL ESTABLISHED -- CHAIRMAN -- MEMBERS. (1) There is
hereby established in the Idaho state police the Idaho peace officer stan-
dards and training council. The chairman of the council shall be appointed
by the governor and shall be a voting member of the council which . The coun-
cil shall be composed of the following members, and which shall reflect a
reasonable geographic balance throughout the state:
(a) Three (3) city chiefs of police or their designees;
(b) Three (3) county sheriffs or their designees;
(c) The director of the Idaho state police or his designee;
(d) A county prosecuting attorney or his designee;
(e) The attorney general or his designee;
(f) The special agent in charge of the Idaho division of the federal bu-
reau of investigation or his designee;
(g) The director of the department of correction or his designee;
(h) The director of the fish and game department or his designee;
(i) The director of the department of juvenile corrections or his de-
signee; and
(j) A representative from the Idaho association of counties juvenile
justice administrators or the Idaho association of counties adult mis-
demeanor probation administrators association.
(j) (2) In addition, there shall be advisory to the council, as ex of-
ficio nonvoting members of the council, the executive directors of the Idaho
association of counties and association of Idaho cities.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.